Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOUTHEAST ASIAN MUSIC FESTIVAL.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to Siengkane Lao MN for a Southeast Asian music festival on the East Side of St. Paul. new text end